pt-BR: Tipo de peça de airsoft: Cano; Bipé; Transportador do ferrolho; Alavanca de manejo; Cilindro; Quebra-chamas; Gearbox; Cápsula de granada; Empunhadura; Guarda-mão; Unidade de hop-up; Cano interno; Carregador; Motor; Nozzle; Pistão; Seção de trilho; Sistema de trilhos; Suporte de mira; Conjunto de parafusos/pinos; Chave seletora; Suporte de mira/ótica; Mola; Coronha; Supressor; Gatilho; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta dijela za airsoft: Cijev; Dvonožac; Nosač zatvarača; Ručica za zapinjanje; Cilindar; Skrivač plamena; Gearbox; Čahura granate; Rukohvat; Prednji rukohvat; Hop-up komora; Unutarnja cijev; Spremnik; Motor; Mlaznica; Klip; Dio šine; Sustav šina; Nosač optike; Set vijaka/klinova; Prekidač za odabir načina paljbe; Nosač nišana/optike; Opruga; Kundak; Prigušivač; Okidač; Ostalo
nl: Type airsoftonderdeel: Loop; Tweepoot; Bolt carrier; Spanhendel; Cilinder; Vlamdemper; Gearbox; Granaathuls; Grip; Handbeschermer; Hop-up-unit; Binnenloop; Magazijn; Motor; Nozzle; Piston; Railsectie; Railsysteem; Scope-montage; Schroeven-/pinnenset; Keuzeschakelaar; Vizier-/optiekbevestiging; Veer; Kolf; Geluiddemper; Trekker; Overig
tr: Airsoft parça türü: Namlu; Çatal ayak; Sürgü takımı; Kurma kolu; Silindir; Alev gizleyen; Dişli kutusu; Bomba kovanı; Kabza; El kundağı; Hop-up ünitesi; İç namlu; Şarjör; Motor; Nozul; Piston; Ray bölümü; Ray sistemi; Dürbün ayağı; Vida/pim seti; Seçim anahtarı; Nişangah/optik montajı; Yay; Dipçik; Susturucu; Tetik; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de peça de airsoft: Cano; Bipé; Ferrolho; Alavanca de armar; Cilindro; Tapa-chamas; Gearbox; Cápsula de granada; Punho; Guarda-mãos; Unidade de hop-up; Cano interno; Carregador; Motor; Bocal; Pistão; Secção de calha; Sistema de calhas; Montagem de mira; Conjunto de parafusos/pinos; Seletor de tiro; Montagem de mira/ótica; Mola; Coronha; Supressor; Gatilho; Outro
ko: 에어소프트 부품 유형: 배럴; 양각대; 볼트 캐리어; 장전 손잡이; 실린더; 소염기; 기어박스; 유탄 쉘; 그립; 핸드가드; 홉업 유닛; 이너 배럴; 탄창; 모터; 노즐; 피스톤; 레일 섹션; 레일 시스템; 스코프 마운트; 나사/핀 세트; 셀렉터 스위치; 조준기/광학 장비 마운트; 스프링; 개머리판; 소음기; 방아쇠; 기타
ja: エアソフトパーツタイプ: バレル; バイポッド; ボルトキャリア; チャージングハンドル; シリンダー; フラッシュハイダー; ギアボックス; グレネードシェル; グリップ; ハンドガード; ホップアップユニット; インナーバレル; マガジン; モーター; ノズル; ピストン; レールセクション; レールシステム; スコープマウント; ネジ/ピンセット; セレクタースイッチ; サイト/光学マウント; スプリング; ストック; サプレッサー; トリガー; その他
el: Τύπος εξαρτήματος Airsoft: Κάννη; Δίποδο; Φορέας κλείστρου; Μοχλός όπλισης; Κύλινδρος; Φλογοκρύπτης; Κιβώτιο ταχυτήτων; Κέλυφος βομβίδας; Λαβή; Χειροφυλακτήρας; Μονάδα hop-up; Εσωτερική κάννη; Γεμιστήρας; Μοτέρ; Ακροφύσιο; Πιστόνι; Τμήμα ράγας; Σύστημα ράγας; Βάση διόπτρας; Σετ βιδών/πείρων; Επιλογέας πυρός; Βάση σκοπευτικού/οπτικού; Ελατήριο; Κοντάκι; Σιγαστήρας; Σκανδάλη; Άλλο
vi: Loại bộ phận súng hơi: Nòng súng; Chân chống chữ V; Cụm bệ khóa nòng; Tay kéo bệ khóa nòng; Xy-lanh; Che chớp lửa; Hộp số; Đạn súng phóng lựu; Tay nắm; Ốp lót tay; Cụm hop-up; Nòng trong; Băng đạn; Động cơ; Đầu phun; Piston; Ray gắn phụ kiện; Hệ thống ray; Giá gắn ống ngắm; Bộ ốc vít/chốt; Công tắc chọn chế độ bắn; Giá đỡ thước ngắm/kính ngắm; Lò xo; Báng súng; Ống giảm thanh; Cò súng; Khác
nb: Airsoft-deltype: Løp; Tofot; Sluttstykke; Ladehåndtak; Sylinder; Flammeskjuler; Girkasse; Granathylse; Grep; Forskjefte; Hop-up-enhet; Innerløp; Magasin; Motor; Munnstykke; Stempel; Skinnedel; Skinnesystem; Kikkertfeste; Skrue-/stiftsett; Velgerbryter; Sikte-/optikkfeste; Fjær; Kolbe; Lyddemper; Avtrekker; Annet
sv: Typ av airsoftdel: Pipa; Stödben; Slutstyckeshållare; Manöverhandtag; Cylinder; Flamdämpare; Växellåda; Granathylsa; Grepp; Handskydd; Hop-up-enhet; Innerpipa; Magasin; Motor; Munstycke; Pistong; Skena; Skensystem; Kikarsiktesfäste; Skruv-/stiftsats; Eldväljare; Sikt-/optikfäste; Fjäder; Kolv; Ljuddämpare; Avtryckare; Annan
lt-LT: „Airsoft“ dalies tipas: Vamzdis; Dvikojis; Spynos rėmas; Užtaisymo rankenėlė; Cilindras; Ugnies slopintuvas; Pavarų dėžė; Granatos tūta; Rankena; Apsodas; „Hop-up“ kamera; Vidinis vamzdis; Dėtuvė; Variklis; Antgalis; Stūmoklis; Bėgelio dalis; Bėgelių sistema; Taikiklio laikiklis; Varžtų / kaiščių rinkinys; Ugnies režimo perjungiklis; Taikiklio / optikos laikiklis; Spyruoklė; Buožė; Slopintuvas; Nuleistukas; Kita
zh-CN: 气枪零件类型: 枪管; 双脚架; 枪栓组件; 拉机柄; 气缸; 消焰器; 波箱; 榴弹壳; 握把; 护木; Hop-up 装置; 内管; 弹匣; 电机; 推嘴; 活塞; 导轨段; 导轨系统; 瞄准镜座; 螺钉/销钉套装; 快慢机; 瞄具/光学仪器底座; 弹簧; 枪托; 消音器; 扳机; 其他
bg-BG: Вид част за еърсофт: Цев; Двунога; Носач на затвора; Лост за зареждане; Цилиндър; Пламегасител; Гиърбокс; Гилза за граната; Ръкохватка; Полуложа; Hop-up камера; Вътрешна цев; Пълнител; Мотор; Дюза; Бутало; Секция за релса; Система от релси; Монтаж за оптика; Комплект винтове/щифтове; Селектор за стрелба; Монтаж за мерник/оптика; Пружина; Приклад; Супресор; Спусък; Друго
en: Airsoft part type: Barrel; Bipod; Bolt carrier; Charging handle; Cylinder; Flash hider; Gearbox; Grenade shell; Grip; Handguard; Hop-up unit; Inner barrel; Magazine; Motor; Nozzle; Piston; Rail section; Rail system; Scope mount; Screw/pin set; Selector switch; Sight/optic mount; Spring; Stock; Suppressor; Trigger; Other
it: Tipo di parte Airsoft: Canna; Bipiede; Porta otturatore; Leva di armamento; Cilindro; Spegnifiamma; Gearbox; Bossolo per granata; Impugnatura; Paramano; Gruppo hop-up; Canna interna; Caricatore; Motore; Spingipallino; Pistone; Sezione slitta; Sistema a slitte; Attacco per ottica; Set di viti/perni; Selettore; Attacco per mirino/ottica; Molla; Calcio; Silenziatore; Grilletto; Altro
fr: Type de pièce d’airsoft: Canon; Bipied; Transporteur de culasse; Levier d’armement; Cylindre; Cache-flamme; Gearbox; Cartouche de grenade; Poignée; Garde-main; Chambre hop-up; Canon interne; Chargeur; Moteur; Nozzle; Piston; Section de rail; Système de rail; Montage de lunette; Jeu de vis/goupilles; Sélecteur de tir; Montage de viseur/optique; Ressort; Crosse; Silencieux; Détente; Autre
zh-TW: 軟氣槍零件類型: 槍管; 雙腳架; 槍機座; 拉機柄; 氣缸; 防火帽; 齒輪箱; 榴彈殼; 握把; 護木; 上旋器總成; 內管; 彈匣; 馬達; 推彈嘴; 活塞; 軌道片; 軌道系統; 瞄準鏡座; 螺絲/插銷組; 快慢機; 瞄具/光學儀器座; 彈簧; 槍托; 滅音器; 扳機; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul piesei cu aer comprimat: Țeavă; Bipied; Port-închizător; Manetă de armare; Cilindru; Ascunzător de flacără; Gearbox; Cartuș de grenadă; Mâner; Uluc; Unitate hop-up; Țeavă internă; Încărcător; Motor; Duză; Piston; Secțiune de șină; Sistem de șine; Suport pentru lunetă; Set de șuruburi/pini; Selector de tir; Suport pentru vizor/optică; Arc; Pat; Amortizor; Trăgaci; Altele
ru: Тип компонента для страйкбола: Ствол; Сошки; Затворная рама; Рукоятка взведения; Цилиндр; Пламегаситель; Гирбокс; Гранатная гильза; Рукоятка; Цевьё; Камера хоп-ап; Внутренний стволик; Магазин; Мотор; Нозл; Поршень; Секция планки; Система планок; Крепление для прицела; Набор винтов/штифтов; Переключатель; Крепление для прицела/оптики; Пружина; Приклад; Глушитель; Спусковой крючок; Другое
th: ประเภทชิ้นส่วนแอร์ซอฟต์: ลำกล้อง; ขาทราย; ชุดลูกเลื่อน; คันรั้ง; กระบอกสูบ; ปลอกลดแสง; เกียร์บ็อกซ์; ปลอกลูกกระสุน; ด้ามจับ; กระโจมมือ; ชุดฮอปอัป; ลำกล้องใน; แม็กกาซีน; มอเตอร์; หัวน็อซเซิล; ลูกสูบ; รางแต่ง; ระบบราง; ขาจับกล้อง; ชุดสกรู/สลัก; สวิตช์ปรับโหมด; ฐานติดศูนย์เล็ง/กล้องเล็ง; สปริง; พานท้าย; ท่อเก็บเสียง; ไกปืน; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta dela za airsoft: Cev; Dvonožnik; Nosilec zaklepa; Ročica za napenjanje; Cilinder; Skrivalnik plamena; Gearbox; Lupina granate; Ročaj; Obloga cevi; Enota hop-up; Notranja cev; Nabojnik; Motor; Šoba; Bat; Segment tirnice; Sistem tirnic; Montaža za strelni daljnogled; Komplet vijakov/zatičev; Selektor; Montaža za merek/optiko; Vzmet; Kopito; Dušilec; Sprožilec; Drugo
es: Tipo de pieza de airsoft: Cañón; Bípode; Portacerrojo; Palanca de carga; Cilindro; Apagallamas; Caja de engranajes; Carcasa de granada; Empuñadura; Guardamanos; Cámara de hop-up; Cañón interno; Cargador; Motor; Boquilla; Pistón; Sección de riel; Sistema de rieles; Montura para mira; Juego de tornillos/pasadores; Selector de tiro; Montura para mira/óptica; Resorte; Culata; Supresor; Gatillo; Otro
pl: Typ części ASG: Lufa; Dwójnóg; Suwadło; Rączka przeładowania; Cylinder; Tłumik płomienia; Gearbox; Łuska granatu; Chwyt; Łoże; Komora Hop-Up; Lufa wewnętrzna; Magazynek; Silnik; Dysza; Tłok; Odcinek szyny; System szyn; Montaż lunety; Zestaw śrub / pinów; Selektor ognia; Montaż celownika/optyki; Sprężyna; Kolba; Tłumik dźwięku; Spust; Inne
cs: Typ airsoftové součástky: Hlaveň; Dvojnožka; Nosič závorníku; Natahovací páka; Válec; Tlumič výšlehu plamene; Mechabox; Granátová patrona; Rukojeť; Předpažbí; Hop-up komora; Vnitřní hlaveň; Zásobník; Motor; Tryska; Píst; Část lišty; Systém lišt; Montáž na puškohled; Sada šroubů/čepů; Přepínač režimu střelby; Montáž na zaměřovač/optiku; Pružina; Pažba; Tlumič; Spoušť; Jiné
da: Airsoft-deltype: Løb; Tofod; Bundstykke; Ladehåndtag; Cylinder; Flammeskjuler; Gearboks; Granathylster; Greb; Forskæfte; Hop-up-enhed; Inderløb; Magasin; Motor; Dyse; Stempel; Skinnesektion; Skinnesystem; Kikkertmontage; Skrue-/stiftsæt; Ildvælger; Sigte-/optikmontage; Fjeder; Kolbe; Lyddæmper; Aftrækker; Andet
fi: Airsoft-osan tyyppi: Piippu; Kaksijalka; Lukonkannatin; Virityskahva; Sylinteri; Liekinsammutin; Rataslaatikko; Kranaattihylsy; Kahva; Etutukki; Hop-up-yksikkö; Sisäpiippu; Lipas; Moottori; Suutin; Mäntä; Kisko-osa; Kisko; Kiikarinjalka; Ruuvi-/tappisarja; Tulenvalitsin; Tähtäin-/optiikkajalka; Jousi; Perä; Äänenvaimennin; Liipaisin; Muu
hu: Airsoft-alkatrész típusa: Cső; Kétlábú állvány (Bipod); Zárkeret; Felhúzókar; Henger; Lángrejtő; Gearbox; Gránáthüvely; Markolat; Előagy; Hop-up kamra; Belső cső; Tár; Motor; Fúvóka; Dugattyú; Sín; Sínrendszer; Távcsőszerelék; Csavar-/csapszegkészlet; Tűzváltó kapcsoló; Irányzék-/optikaszerelék; Rugó; Tusa; Hangtompító; Elsütőbillentyű; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ airsoftovej súčiastky: Hlaveň; Dvojnožka; Nosič závorníka; Naťahovacia páka; Valec; Tlmič výšľahu; Mechabox; Granátová patróna; Rukoväť; Predpažbie; Hop-up komora; Vnútorná hlaveň; Zásobník; Motor; Tryska; Piest; Časť lišty; Lištový systém; Montáž na puškohľad; Súprava skrutiek/čapov; Prepínač režimu streľby; Montáž na zameriavač/optiku; Pružina; Pažba; Tlmič; Spúšť; Iný
de: Typ für Airsoft-Teil: Lauf; Zweibein; Verschlussträger; Ladehebel; Zylinder; Mündungsfeuerdämpfer; Gearbox; Granatenhülse; Griff; Handschutz; Hop-Up-Unit; Innenlauf; Magazin; Motor; Nozzle; Piston; Schienenabschnitt; Schienensystem; Zielfernrohrmontage; Schrauben-/Stiftset; Feuerwahlschalter; Visier-/Optikmontage; Feder; Schaft; Schalldämpfer; Abzug; Sonstige